Hawaii statutes.
[§654-8] Plaintiff's option. If the
party found to be entitled to the property is not already in possession thereof
by delivery under this chapter, or otherwise, the party may, in addition to an
execution for damages awarded under section 654-7, at the party's option have
an execution for the delivery of the specific property, or for the value
thereof. If any portion of the property cannot be obtained on execution the
party entitled thereto may take the remainder and apply for and obtain a
supplementary judgment for the value of the missing portion together with
damages. [L Sp 1949, c 7, pt of §1; RL 1955, §244-28; HRS §654-29; am L 1972, c
90, §1(f); ren HRS §654-8; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 64, 69, 70.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next